Massachusetts, session 194th, H3920.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding chapter 21G of the General Laws, or any other general or
special law or regulation to the contrary, the Tyngsborough Water District may withdraw up to
1,000,000 gallons of water per day from water sources on its properties.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage
of 1